Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF122.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2356YH (3) 91 jda/jh H.F. 122 Section 1. Section 257.11, subsection 5, paragraph a, 1 subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 (1) In order to provide additional funding to increase 3 student opportunities and redirect more resources to student 4 programming for school districts that share operational 5 functions, a district that shares with a political subdivision 6 one or more operational functions of a curriculum director, 7 master social worker, independent social worker, work-based 8 learning coordinator, special education director, mental health 9 professional who holds a statement of recognition issued by the 10 board of educational examiners, college and career transition 11 counselor or coordinator, school resource officer, or school 12 counselor, or one or more operational functions in the areas 13 of superintendent management, business management, human 14 resources, transportation, or operation and maintenance for at 15 least twenty percent of the school year shall be assigned a 16 supplementary weighting for each shared operational function. 17 A school district that shares an operational function in 18 the area of superintendent management shall be assigned a 19 supplementary weighting of nine pupils for the function. A 20 school district that shares an operational function in the 21 area of business management, human resources, transportation, 22 or operation and maintenance , or a school resource officer, 23 shall be assigned a supplementary weighting of five pupils for 24 the function. A school district that shares the operational 25 functions of a curriculum director; a master social worker or 26 an independent social worker licensed under chapters 147 and 27 154C ; a work-based learning coordinator; a special education 28 director; a mental health professional who holds a statement 29 of recognition issued by the board of educational examiners; 30 a college and career transition counselor or coordinator; 31 a school resource officer; or a school counselor shall be 32 assigned a supplementary weighting of three pupils for the 33 function. The additional weighting shall be assigned for 34 each discrete operational function shared. However, a school 35 -1- LSB 2356YH (3) 91 jda/jh 1/ 3 H.F. 122 district may receive the additional weighting under this 1 subsection for sharing the services of an individual with 2 a political subdivision or another school district even if 3 the type of operational function performed by the individual 4 for the school district and the type of operational function 5 performed by the individual for the political subdivision or 6 another school district are not the same operational function, 7 so long as either both operational functions are eligible for 8 weighting under this subsection or the operational function 9 the individual performs for the school district is special 10 education director. In either case, the school district 11 shall be assigned the additional weighting for the type of 12 operational function that the individual performs for the 13 school district, and the school district shall not receive 14 additional weighting for any other function performed by the 15 individual. The operational function sharing arrangement does 16 not need to be a newly implemented sharing arrangement to 17 receive supplementary weighting under this subsection . 18 Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies July 1, 2025, for 19 school budget years beginning on or after that date. 20